Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 60.17, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 60.17. A. The court shall consider the safety of any
and all alleged victims of domestic violence, stalking, harassment,
sexual assault, or forcible sodomy where the defendant is alleged to
have violated a protective order, committed domestic assault and
battery, stalked, sexually assaulted, or forcibly sodomized the
alleged victim or victims prior to the release of the alleged
defendant from custody on bond. The court, after consideration and

to ensure the safety of the alleged victim or victims, may issue an
emergency protective order pursuant to the Protection from Domestic
Abuse Act. The court may also issue to the alleged victim or
victims an order restraining the alleged defendant from any activity
or action from which they he or she may be restrained under the
Protection from Domestic Abuse Act. The court shall not consider a
“no contact order as condition of bond” as a factor when determining
whether the petitioner is eligible for relief. The protective order
shall remain in effect until either a plea has been accepted,
sentencing has occurred in the case, the case has been dismissed, or
until further order of the court dismissing the protective order.
In conjunction with any protective order or restraining order
authorized by this section, the court may order the defendant to use
an active, real-time, twenty-four-hour Global Positioning System
(GPS) monitoring device for such term as the court deems
appropriate. Upon application of the victim, the court may
authorize the victim to monitor the location of the defendant. Such
monitoring by the victim shall be limited to the ability of the
victim to make computer or cellular inquiries to determine if the
defendant is within a specified distance of locations, excluding the
residence or workplace of the defendant, or to receive a computer-
or a cellular-generated signal if the defendant comes within a
specified distance of the victim. The court shall conduct an annual
review of the monitoring order to determine if such order to monitor
the location of the defendant is still necessary. Before the court
orders the use of a GPS device, the court shall find that the
defendant has a history that demonstrates an intent to commit
violence against the victim, including, but not limited to, prior
conviction for an offense under the Protection from Domestic Abuse
Act or any other violent offense, or any other evidence that shows
by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant is likely to
commit violence against the victim. The court may further order the
defendant to pay costs and expenses related to the GPS device and
monitoring, unless the court finds the defendant indigent, and in
that event may order an alternative payment fund, county services
fund, or other condition in lieu of payment, if available.
B. 1. In addition to monitoring by the victim pursuant to
subsection A of this section, the court may order any defendant
charged with domestic abuse by strangulation, domestic abuse with a
dangerous or deadly weapon, or domestic abuse after a previous
adjudication for domestic abuse to not be released on bail without
ENR. S. B. NO. 1325 Page 2

GPS monitoring. The cost of the monitoring device and monitoring
service shall be paid by the defendant at his or her own expense
until the conclusion of the criminal case, unless the court finds
the defendant indigent, and in that event may order an alternative
payment fund, county services fund, or other condition in lieu of
payment, if available. The Department of Corrections shall provide
a list of appropriate GPS monitoring programs or systems for use by
the courts and provide minimum requirements for jurisdictions that
do not use the programs on the list. At the conclusion of the
criminal case, the court shall order the removal of the GPS
monitoring device if the defendant is acquitted, is to be
incarcerated, the case is dismissed or as determined by the court.
2. Upon application of the victim, the court may authorize the
victim to monitor the location of the defendant by receiving a
computer- or cellular-generated signal if the defendant is within a
specified distance of the residence or workplace of the victim.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1325 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1325 Page 4